Utah statutes.
51-7-9.   Quarterly reports by state treasurer -- Audit of accounts of state treasurer -- Report of audit -- Employment of investment staff and services.

The state treasurer shall report not less often than quarterly to each participating state officer, board, commission, institution, department, division, agency, or other similar instrumentality, or political subdivision, the activities, investments, and performance of his office during the preceding period. The accounts of the state treasurer shall be audited annually under the direction of the state auditor. The report of this audit shall be open for inspection by the public in the offices of the state auditor and the state treasurer and a copy of it shall be submitted to the legislature through the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The state treasurer is authorized, within the limits of available appropriations, to employ such investment staff and secure such financial, investment, and other technical services he considers necessary to properly carry out his responsibilities under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 44, 1984 General Session

